Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3127
Production activity; application for qualification; contents; fee.

(1) For a production activity to qualify as a qualified production activity under the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, a production company must file an application for qualification of a production activity to the department at least:

(a) Thirty days prior to the start of principal photography for a full-length film, documentary, or television programming; and

(b) Ten days prior to the start of filming for a short-length film, animation project, or commercial.

(2) The application shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the department and shall include the following:

(a) A nonrefundable fee of five hundred dollars;

(b) A detailed description of the production activity;

(c) An estimate of expected qualifying expenditures for the production activity;

(d) A certificate of general liability insurance with a minimum coverage of one million dollars;

(e) A worker's compensation policy;

(f)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(f)(ii) of this section, documentation that shows the production activity is fully funded other than post-production expenditures.

(ii) If a production activity is a commercial production activity, documentation showing full funding for post-production expenditures shall be included; and

(g) Any other information or documentation required by the department.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 7.